test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VINIT_IMP_aakozi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - VINIT - aakozi - IMP :

  #Template Key
  #1
  #imperative

     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     aakozi+VAI+Imp+Del+2: aakozikan
     aakozi+VAI+Imp+Del+2+Pl: aakozikag
     aakozi+VAI+Imp+Imm+2: aakozin
     aakozi+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl: aakozidaa
     aakozi+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+Pl: aakozig
     aakozi+VAI+Imp+Proh+2: aakoziken
     aakozi+VAI+Imp+Proh+2+1+Pl: aakozisiidaa
     aakozi+VAI+Imp+Proh+2+Pl: aakozikegon
     
